Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 2. Guardians of Minors.

Sec. 13.26.101.
Status of guardian of minor; general.

A person becomes a guardian of a minor by acceptance of a testamentary appointment or upon appointment by the court. The guardianship status continues until terminated, without regard to the location from time to time of the guardian and minor ward.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.030; renumbered in 2016.

Secs. 13.26.105 — 13.26.109.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.221, 13.26.226, 13.26.231, 13.26.236, and 13.26.241.]

Sec. 13.26.110.
Findings; order of appointment. [Repealed, § 21 ch 83 SLA 1981.
For current law see AS 13.26.266.]

Sec. 13.26.111.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.246.]

Sec. 13.26.112.
Appointment of a guardian ad litem. [Repealed, § 31 ch 84 SLA 2004. For current law see AS 13.26.041.]

Secs. 13.26.113 — 13.26.120.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.251, 13.26.256, 13.26.261, 13.26.266, 13.26.271, 13.26.276, and 13.26.281.]

Sec. 13.26.121.
Testamentary appointment of guardian of minor.

The parent of a minor may appoint by will a guardian of an unmarried minor.
Subject to the right of the minor under AS

13.26.126

, a testamentary appointment becomes effective upon filing the guardian’s acceptance in the court in which the will is probated, if before acceptance, both parents are dead or the surviving parent is adjudged incapacitated. If both parents are dead, an effective appointment by the parent who died later has priority.
This state recognizes a testamentary appointment effected by filing the guardian’s acceptance under a will probated in another state which is the testator’s domicile.
Upon acceptance of appointment, written notice of acceptance must be given by the guardian to the minor and to the person having care of the minor, or to the minor’s nearest adult relation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 23 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.035

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.126

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.040” to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Sec. 13.26.125.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.286.]

Sec. 13.26.126.
Objection by minor of 14 or older to testamentary appointment.

A minor of 14 or more years may prevent an appointment of a testamentary guardian for the minor from becoming effective, or may cause a previously accepted appointment to terminate, by filing with the court in which the will is probated a written objection to the appointment before it is accepted or within 30 days after notice of its acceptance.
An objection may be withdrawn.
An objection does not preclude appointment by the court in a proper proceeding of the testamentary nominee, or any other suitable person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 24 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.040; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.130.
Visitor in guardianship proceeding. [Repealed, § 21 ch 83 SLA 1981. For current law see AS 13.26.226 and 13.26.236.]

Sec. 13.26.131.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.291.]

Sec. 13.26.132.
Court appointment of guardian of minor; conditions for appointment.

The court may appoint a guardian for an unmarried minor if all parental rights of custody have been terminated or suspended by circumstances or prior court order.
A guardian appointed by will as provided in AS

13.26.121

whose appointment has not been prevented or nullified under AS

13.26.126

has priority over any guardian who may be appointed by the court but the court may proceed with an appointment upon a finding that the testamentary guardian has failed to accept the testamentary appointment within 30 days after notice of the guardianship proceeding.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 25 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.045

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.121

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.035

” and “AS

13.26.126

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.040”.

Sec. 13.26.135.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.296.]

Sec. 13.26.137.
Venue for proceedings.

The venue for guardianship proceedings for a minor is in the place where the minor resides or is present.

The venue for a guardianship proceeding for a child in state custody under AS 47.10 is the

superior court where the child-in-need-of-aid proceeding is pending as provided under AS

47.10.111

; or

judicial district in which the petitioner resides if the petitioner provides notice to all of the parties to the child-in-need-of-aid proceeding and no party objects.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 6 4SSLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.050; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (b).

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 18,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016, subsection (b) applies “to proceedings for adoption or legal guardianship of a child in state custody under
AS 47.10 filed on or after January 1, 2017.”

Secs. 13.26.140, 13.26.141.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.301 and 13.26.306.]

Sec. 13.26.143.
Court appointment of guardian of minor; qualifications; priority of minor’s nominee and adult family member.

The court may appoint as guardian any adult whose appointment would be in the best interests of the minor and is consistent with a priority given to an adult family member. The court shall appoint a person nominated by the minor, if the minor is 14 years of age or older, unless the court finds the appointment contrary to the best interests of the minor. In this section, “adult family member” has the meaning given in AS

47.10.990

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.055

; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, in the first sentence substituted “adult” for “person” and added “and is consistent with a priority given to an adult family member” at the end of the sentence, and added the last sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The court has broad discretion in the appointment of a guardian. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 25.

Mental Health Division cannot assume duties and responsibilities of court-appointed general guardian.
1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 25.

Sec. 13.26.145.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.311.]

Sec. 13.26.147
Court appointment of guardian of minor; procedure.

Notice of the time and place of hearing of a petition for the appointment of a guardian of a minor is to be given by the petitioner in the manner prescribed by AS

13.06.110

to:

the minor, if the minor is 14 or more years of age;

the person who has had the principal care and custody of the minor during the 60 days preceding the date of the petition; and

any living parent of the minor.

Upon hearing, if the court finds that a qualified person seeks appointment, venue is proper, the required notices have been given, the requirements of AS

13.26.132

have been met, and the welfare and best interests of the minor will be served by the requested appointment, it shall make the appointment. In other cases the court may dismiss the proceedings, or make any other disposition of the matter that will best serve the interest of the minor.

If necessary, the court may appoint a temporary guardian, with the status of an ordinary guardian of a minor, but the authority of a temporary guardian shall not last longer than six months.

If, at any time in the proceeding, the court determines that the interests of the minor are or may be inadequately represented, it may appoint an attorney to represent the minor, giving consideration to the preference of the minor if the minor is 14 years of age or older.

A petitioner seeking appointment as the guardian of a minor in state custody under AS 47.10 shall file the petition in either the court where the child-in- need-of-aid proceedings are pending or the judicial district in which the petitioner resides, as required under AS

13.26.137(b)

and AS

47.10.111

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 6 4SSLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.060; renumbered in 2016 at which time in subsection (b) “AS

13.26.132

” was substituted for “AS

13.26.045

” and in subsection (e) “AS

13.26.137(b)

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.050(b)”.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (e).

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 18,
ch. 6, 4SSLA 2016, subsection (e) applies “to proceedings for adoption or legal guardianship of a child in state custody under
AS 47.10 filed on or after January 1, 2017.”

Sec. 13.26.150.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.316.]

Sec. 13.26.153.
Subsidized guardianship; procedure.

Procedures relating to subsidized guardianships for hard-to-place children are governed by AS

25.23.200

—

25.23.240

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 204 SLA 1990)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.062; renumbered in 2016.

Administrative Code. —

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

For subsidized adoption and subsidized guardianship payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 2.

Sec. 13.26.155.
Proceedings subsequent to appointment; venue. [Repealed, § 31 ch 53 SLA 2008.]

Sec. 13.26.157.
Guardianship after voluntary relinquishment; procedure.

In addition to the applicable procedures under this chapter, a guardianship decree and review of a guardianship decree are governed by the procedures established under AS

25.23.180

and, for a child-in-need-of-aid, AS

47.10.089

, pertaining to voluntary relinquishment of parental rights and retaining of parental privileges in a guardianship decree.

History.

(§ 2 ch 64 SLA 2005)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.064; renumbered in 2016.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 60(a),
ch. 64, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 enactment of this section has the effect of amending Rules 14 and 15, Alaska Rules of Probate Procedure, by providing that retained privileges be set out in the guardianship decree and by providing additional procedures related to a voluntary relinquishment of parental rights.

Sec. 13.26.162.
Consent to service by acceptance of appointment; notice; letters of guardianship requirement.

By accepting a testamentary or court appointment as guardian, a guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the guardianship that may be instituted by any interested person.
Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the guardian, or mailed by ordinary mail to the guardian’s address as listed in the court records and to the guardian’s address as then known to the petitioner. Letters of guardianship must indicate whether the guardian was appointed by will or by court order.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.065; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.165.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.401.]

Sec. 13.26.167.
Powers and duties of guardian of minor.

A guardian of a minor has the powers and responsibilities of a parent who has not been deprived of custody of a minor and unemancipated child, except that a guardian is not legally obligated to provide from the guardian’s own funds for the ward and is not liable to third persons by reason of the parental relationship for acts of the ward.
In particular, and without qualifying the foregoing, a guardian

must take reasonable care of the ward’s personal effects and commence protective proceedings if necessary to protect other property of the ward;

may receive money payable for the support of the ward to the ward’s parent, guardian or custodian under the terms of any statutory benefit or insurance system, or any private contract, devise, trust, conservatorship or custodianship; the guardian also may receive money or property of the ward paid or delivered by virtue of AS

13.26.031

; any sums so received shall be applied to the ward’s current needs for support, care and education; the guardian must exercise due care to conserve any excess for the ward’s future needs unless a conservator has been appointed for the estate of the ward, in which case excess shall be paid over at least annually to the conservator; sums so received by the guardian may not be used for compensation for the guardian’s services except as approved by order of court or as determined by a duly appointed conservator other than the guardian; a guardian may institute proceedings to compel the performance by any person of a duty to support the ward or to pay sums for the welfare of the ward;

may facilitate the ward’s education, social, or other activities and authorize medical or other professional care, treatment, or advice; a guardian is not liable by reason of this consent for injury to the ward resulting from the negligence or acts of third persons unless it would have been illegal for a parent to have consented; a guardian may consent to the marriage or adoption of the ward;

must report the condition of the ward and of the ward’s estate which has been subject to the guardian’s possession or control, as ordered by court on petition of any person interested in the minor’s welfare or as required by court rule.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972; am § 26 ch 56 SLA 1973)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS

13.26.070

; renumbered in 2016 at which time “AS

13.26.031

” was substituted for “AS 13.26.015”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Mental Health Division cannot assume duties and responsibilities of court-appointed general guardian.
1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 25.

Sec. 13.26.170.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.406.]

Sec. 13.26.171.
Termination of appointment of guardian; general.

A guardian’s authority and responsibility terminate upon the death, resignation, or removal of the guardian or upon the minor’s death, adoption, marriage, or attainment of majority, but termination does not affect the guardian’s liability for prior acts, nor the obligation to account for funds and assets of the ward.
Resignation of a guardian does not terminate the guardianship until it has been approved by the court.
A testamentary appointment under an informally probated will terminates if the will is later denied probate in a formal proceeding.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.075; renumbered in 2016.

Secs. 13.26.175, 13.26.180.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.411 and 13.26.415.]

Sec. 13.26.181.
Proceedings subsequent to appointment; venue.

The court where the ward resides has concurrent jurisdiction with the court which appointed the guardian, or in which acceptance of a testamentary appointment was filed, over resignation, removal, accounting, and other proceedings relating to the guardianship.

If the court located where the ward resides is not the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed, the court in which proceedings subsequent to appointment are commenced shall in all appropriate cases notify the other court, in this or another state, and after consultation with that court determine whether to retain jurisdiction or transfer the proceedings to the other court, whichever is in the best interest of the ward. A copy of any order accepting a resignation or removing a guardian shall be sent to the court in which acceptance of appointment is filed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.080; renumbered in 2016.

Sec. 13.26.185.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.420.]

Sec. 13.26.186.
Resignation or removal proceedings; appointment of attorney for minor.

Any person interested in the welfare of a ward, or the ward, if 14 or more years of age, may petition for removal of a guardian on the ground that removal would be in the best interest of the ward. A guardian may petition for permission to resign. A petition for removal or for permission to resign may, but need not, include a request for appointment of a successor guardian.

After notice and hearing on a petition for removal or for permission to resign, the court may terminate the guardianship and make any further order that may be appropriate.

If, at any time in the proceeding, the court determines that the interests of the ward are or may be inadequately represented, it may appoint an attorney to represent the minor, giving consideration to the preference of the minor if the minor is 14 or more years of age.

History.

(§ 1 ch 78 SLA 1972)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly AS 13.26.085; renumbered in 2016.

Secs. 13.26.190 — 13.26.200.
[Renumbered as AS 13.26.425 — 13.26.435.]